apertium-tat.tat.lexc
LEXICON FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION

PLURAL ;
CASES-ETC ;
POSSESSIVES ;
ABESSIVE-POSTPOSITION ;
LI-POSTPOSITION ;

!==============================================================================!
!                 ADJECTIVE'S (ADJECTIVIAL) INFLECTION
!
! FIXME: this section might need some refactoring
!! e.g. change <adj><comp><subst> to <adj><subst><comp>
!! and make use of COMPARATIVE continuation class
!==============================================================================!

LEXICON COMPARATIVE

%<comp%>:%>р%{A%}%{K%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON A1                ! adjectives that can be both substantivized and andverbialized;
                          ! all three readings (<adj>, <adj.subst> and <adj.advl>) have comparison levels.
                          !# яхшы, тиз

%<adj%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;                        !# яхшы кеше
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>р%{A%}%{K%} CLITICS-INCL-COP ;   !# яхшырак эш

%<adj%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;                             !# "Яхшы яхшыны тудыра."
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<subst%>:%>р%{A%}%{K%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;        !# яхшыракны таптым

%<adj%>%<advl%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;                               !# "Тиз янган тиз сүнгән."
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<advl%>:%>р%{A%}%{K%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;          !# "Бәла бәхеттән тизрәк йөри."

LEXICON A2                 ! adjectives without adverbial reading;
                           ! <adj> and <adj.subst> readings have comparison levels.
                           !# иске

%<adj%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;                        !# иске дус
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>р%{A%}%{K%} CLITICS-INCL-COP ;   !# искерәк версия

%<adj%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;                             !# "Яңа булды дип, искене ташлама."
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<subst%>:%>р%{A%}%{K%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;        !# "Ихтимал, бу бина башкасы, искерәге урынында утырадыр."

LEXICON A3                 ! adjectives without adverbial reading & so-called "predicatives" (бар, юк);
                           ! no comparison levels at all.
                           !# язгы, яшьлек, бар, юк

%<adj%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;                     !# язгы кыр эшләре
%<adj%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;                             !# "Ул 14-25 яшьлекләргә бирелә."
                                                      !# "Хатыны юкның якыны юк." !# "Эше барның ашы бар."

! FIXME:NOTE:loc.attr/subst form of some of them seems to be overgeneration:
! e.g. *язгыдагы

LEXICON A4                 ! "pure" adjectives - no adverbial and substantive readings, no comparison levels;
                           !# милли

%<adj%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;                     !# милли музей

LEXICON V-ADJ

# ;
%<subst%>: GER-INFL ; ! Dont't be confused by the name of the cont.class,
                      ! it's basically just a simplified N-INFL-COMMON





!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     VERBAL INFLECTION

LEXICON V-PERS-S1-NO1PERSON

%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}ң CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CLITICS-NO-COP ;

%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S1          ! Тулы төрләнеш

! Used for: -IR/AR-<fut>, copula

V-PERS-S1-NO1PERSON ;
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{I%}н CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>б%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S1-COP

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{I%}н CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}ң CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>б%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;

%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S2          ! Кыска төрләнеш

! Used for: -DI-<ifi>, -sA-<prc_cond>, -sA-<gna_cond>

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>ң CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>к CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>г%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! FIXME %{L%} shouldn't be neccessery here,
                                  ! change it to 'л'

%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>г%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>г%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON V-PERS-PRESENT

! As the name indicates, used for -{E}-<pres>

V-PERS-S1-NO1PERSON ;
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{I%}н CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>б%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON V-PERS-VOLITIONAL

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>ң CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>б%{I%}з CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>г%{I%}з CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р%>%{I%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;

%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>г%{I%}з CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>г%{I%}з CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;

!!!!!!!   G E R U N D S   I N F L E C T I O N

! This is a somewhat simplified version of N-INFL-COMMON.
! The idea was to avoid overgeneration (I don't think that ger+DAGI would take
! case endings e.g. Same for ger+NIKI). Still, this cont.class might be not
! suitable for all of the gerunds. /IS/

! FIXME: duplicated code here. GER-CASE-NO_COPULA, for instance, is the same thing as "CasesWithoutCopulas" cont.class

LEXICON GER-CASE-NO_COPULA

CASES-COMMON ;
%<nom%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}н CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON GER-ATTR-SUBST

%<attr%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
!%<subst%>: CASE ;
!%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASE ;

LEXICON GER-ABE-ATTR/ADVL/SUBST

!%<attr%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<advl%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
!%<subst%>: CASE-2 ;
!%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASE-2 ;

LEXICON GER-ABE-ETC          ! Stuff which doesn't appear after possessives

%+сыз%<post%>:%>с%{I%}з GER-ABE-ATTR/ADVL/SUBST ;

LEXICON GER-GENPOSS-ETC      ! Stuff which can appear after possessives too

%<px%>:%>н%{I%}к%{I%}%{n%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}г%{I%} GER-ATTR-SUBST ;
%<sim%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}й CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON GER-CASE-ETC

GER-CASE-NO_COPULA ;
GER-GENPOSS-ETC ;

LEXICON GER-POSS-REAL-COMMON

%<px1sg%>:%>%{I%}м GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{I%}ң GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{I%}б%{I%}з GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{I%}г%{I%}з GER-CASE-ETC ;

%<px2sg%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}г%{I%}з GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}г%{I%}з GER-CASE-ETC ;

LEXICON GER_FUT3-POSS-REAL

GER-POSS-REAL-COMMON ;
%<px3sp%>: GER-CASE-ETC ;

LEXICON GER-POSS-REAL

GER-POSS-REAL-COMMON ;
%<px3sp%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} GER-CASE-ETC ;

LEXICON GER-INFL

GER-POSS-REAL ;
GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р GER-POSS-REAL ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р GER-CASE-ETC ;
GER-ABE-ETC ;

!!!!!!!   end of gerunds inflection lexicon

LEXICON V-FUT-IR

%<fut%>:%>%{I%}р V-PERS-S1 ;
%<neg%>%<fut%>:%>м%{A%}с V-PERS-S1-NO1PERSON ;
%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{A%}%>м CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{A%}с%>м%{I%}н CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR
%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{A%}%>м%{I%}н CLITICS-NO-COP ;  ! Dir/LR
%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>м%{A%}%>б%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;

%<gpr_fut%>:%>%{I%}р V-ADJ ;
%<neg%>%<gpr_fut%>:%>м%{A%}с V-ADJ ;

%<gpr_ppot%>:%>%{I%}рл%{I%}к # ;
%<neg%>%<gpr_ppot%>:%>м%{A%}сл%{I%}к # ;

%<ger_fut%>:%>%{I%}р GER-POSS-REAL ;
%<neg%>%<ger_fut%>:%>м%{A%}с GER-POSS-REAL ;

%<ger_ppot%>:%>%{I%}рл%{I%}к GER-POSS-REAL ;
%<neg%>%<ger_ppot%>:%>м%{A%}сл%{I%}к GER-POSS-REAL ;

%<inf%>:%>%{I%}рг%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<neg%>%<inf%>:%>м%{A%}ск%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

 LEXICON Nouns
гайре:гайре A3 ; ! ""
мәгълүм:мәгълүм A3 ; ! "" Use/MT
мәзкүрә:мәзкүрә A3 ; ! ""
мәзкүр:мәзкүр A3 ; ! ""
мәншүрле:мәншүрле A4 ; ! "" Use/MT
мәрдүд:мәрдүд A3 ; ! "" Use/MT
мәсмүг:мәсмүг A3 ; ! "" Use/MT
почетный:почетный A4 ; ! ""
сумлык:сумлык A3 ; ! "" Use/MT
ярымлык:ярымлык A3 ; ! "" Use/MT
мактүл:мактүл A3 ; ! "" Use/MT
һәфтәлек:һәфтәлек A3 ; ! ""
вафат:вафат A3 ; ! ""
 LEXICON Adjectives
пакъстанлы:пакъстанлы A4 ; ! ""
абсолют:абсолют A4 ; ! ""
айлы:айлы A4 ; ! ""
антропологик:антропологик A4 ; ! ""
архитектур:архитектур A4 ; ! ""
бәхәсле:бәхәсле A4 ; ! ""
бөтенроссия:бөтенроссия A4 ; ! ""
гасырлык:гасырлык A4 ; ! ""
геологик:геологик A4 ; ! ""
гомерлек:гомерлек A4 ; ! ""
гуманистик:гуманистик A4 ; ! ""
диэлектрик:диэлектрик A4 ; ! ""
идеаль:идеаль A4 ; ! ""
инженерлык:инженерлык A4 ; ! ""
исламчыл:исламчыл A4 ; ! ""
квалификацияле:квалификацияле A4 ; ! ""
композицион:композицион A4 ; ! ""
күмәк:күмәк A4 ; ! ""
кытайлы:кытайлы A4 ; ! ""
математик:математик A4 ; ! ""
мәҗбүр:мәҗбүр A4 ; ! ""
монголоид:монголоид A4 ; ! ""
мүгълүмати:мүгълүмати A4 ; ! ""
өйле:өйле A4 ; ! ""
постсовет:постсовет A4 ; ! ""
психологик:психологик A4 ; ! ""
рецессив:рецессив A4 ; ! ""
синтаксик:синтаксик A4 ; ! ""
стационар:стационар A4 ; ! " nount + adjective"
табышсыз:табышсыз A4 ; ! ""
территориаль:территориаль A4 ; ! ""
тип%-тигез:тип%-тигез A4 ; ! ""
утрак:утрак A4 ; ! ""
философик:философик A4 ; ! ""
химик:химик A4 ; ! ""
шартлаткыч:шартлаткыч A4 ; ! ""
электрон:электрон A4 ; ! ""
этнографик:этнографик A4 ; ! ""
алдынгы:алдынгы A3 ; ! ""
асыл:асыл A3 ; ! ""
ачулы:ачулы A3 ; ! ""
башлангыч:башлангыч A3 ; ! "~initial"
берек:берек A3 ; ! ""
бәйләнешле:бәйләнешле A3 ; ! ""
еллык:еллык A3 ; ! "-летний,годовой,годичный"
әлеге:әлеге A3 ; ! "" FIXME CHECK
кәбисә:кәбисә A3 ; ! ""
куш:куш A3 ; ! ""
күчмә:күчмә A3 ; ! ""
өстәмә:өстәмә A3 ; ! ""
рухани:рухани%{ъ%} A3 ; ! ""
тиеш:тиеш A3 ; ! ""
тоташ:тоташ A3 ; ! ""
традицион:традицион A3 ; ! ""
туган:туган A3 ; ! "родной"
турындагы:турындагы A3 ; ! ""
федераль:федераль A3 ; ! ""
хәрам:хәрам A3 ; ! ""
хур:хур A3 ; ! ""
чиктәш:чиктәш A3 ; ! ""
шәхси:шәхси A3 ; ! ""
эчке:эчке A3 ; ! "internal"
ябык:ябык A3 ; ! "closed"
яшьлек:яшьлек A3 ; ! "after numerals: of ageX"
аксыл:аксыл A2 ; ! ""
аулак:аулак A2 ; ! ""
ачы:ачы A2 ; ! ""
башлы:башлы A2 ; ! ""
бәяле:бәяле A2 ; ! ""
гади:гади A2 ; ! ""
газиз:газиз A2 ; ! ""
әһәмиятле:әһәмиятле A2 ; ! ""
җитди:җитди A2 ; ! ""
иясез:иясез A2 ; ! ""
катлаулы:катлаулы A2 ; ! ""
кодрәтле:кодрәтле A2 ; ! ""
кызгылт:кызгылт A2 ; ! ""
кыргый:кыргый A2 ; ! ""
мөһим:мөһим A2 ; ! ""
охшаш:охшаш A2 ; ! ""
сазламык:сазламык A2 ; ! ""
тартым:тартым A2 ; ! ""
тиешле:тиешле A2 ; ! ""
түгәрәк:түгәрәк A2 ; ! "round, circular"
уртача:уртача A2 ; ! ""
үләнчел:үләнчел A2 ; ! ""
хәл% иткеч:хәл% иткеч A2 ; ! "" Use/MT
шат:шат A2 ; ! ""
юеш:юеш A2 ; ! ""
уңдырышлы:уңдырышлы A2 ; ! ""
канлы:канлы A2 ; ! ""
бөдрә:бөдрә A2 ; ! ""
майлы:майлы A2 ; ! ""
тозлы:тозлы A2 ; ! ""
абруйлы:абруйлы A2 ; ! ""
авыру:авыру A2 ; ! ""
азаккы:азаккы A3 ; ! ""
актив:актив A1 ; ! ""
актуаль:актуаль A2 ; ! ""
акылсыз:акылсыз A2 ; ! ""
ал:ал A2 ; ! ""
аллы%-гөлле:аллы%-гөлле A2 ; ! ""
арык:арык A2 ; ! ""
ары% табангы:ары% табангы A3 ; ! ""
бай:бай A1 ; ! ""
балалы:балалы A4 ; ! ""
башка:башка A2 ; ! ""
бердәнбер:бердәнбер A3 ; ! ""
бөек:бөек A2 ; ! ""
булдыклы:булдыклы A2 ; ! ""
вакытлыча:вакытлыча A1 ; ! ""
даими:даими A2 ; ! ""
демократик:демократик A4 ; ! "democratic"
әйбәт:әйбәт A1 ; ! ""
әшәке:әшәке A2 ; ! ""
җәһәт:җәһәт A1 ; ! ""
җирән:җирән A2 ; ! ""
җирле:җирле A3 ; ! ""
зәңгәр:зәңгәр A3 ; ! ""
иҗтимагый:иҗтимагый A3 ; ! ""
иңле:иңле A2 ; ! ""
иркен:иркен A1 ; ! ""
искиткеч:искиткеч A1 ; ! ""
кайнар:кайнар A1 ; ! ""
каты:каты A1 ; ! ""
кирәк:кирәк A1 ; ! ""
көрән:көрән A1 ; ! "light brown"
криминаль:криминаль A1 ; ! ""
күренмәле:күренмәле A1 ; ! ""
кызу:кызу A1 ; ! ""
кырыс:кырыс A1 ; ! ""
мәгънәле:мәгънәле A1 ; ! ""
мохтаҗ:мохтаҗ A1 ; ! ""
нәүбәтле:нәүбәтле A1 ; ! ""
өзлексез:өзлексез A1 ; ! ""
пленар:пленар A1 ; ! ""
рәхимле:рәхимле A1 ; ! ""
сау:сау A1 ; ! ""
сөекле:сөекле A1 ; ! ""
суык:суык A1 ; ! ""
тартык:тартык A1 ; ! ""
тигез:тигез A1 ; ! ""
тонык:тонык A1 ; ! ""
түбән:түбән A1 ; ! ""
тын:тын A1 ; ! ""
үлек:үлек A1 ; ! ""
урындагы:урындагы A1 ; ! ""
хас:хас A1 ; ! ""
хосусый:хосусый A1 ; ! ""
чит:чит A1 ; ! ""
шәһри:шәһри A1 ; ! ""
юан:юан A1 ; ! ""
якын:якын A1 ; ! ""
яп%-якты:яп%-якты A1 ; ! ""
яшерен:яшерен A1 ; ! ""
бастырган:бастырган A1 ; ! ""
гаҗәеп:гаҗәеп A1 ; ! ""
җем%-җем% итеп% торган:җем%-җем% итеп% торган A1 ; ! ""
көтмәгән:көтмәгән A1 ; ! ""
танылган:танылган A1 ; ! ""
кып%-кызыл:кып%-кызыл A4 ; ! ""
